nl: Brandstofinjector sproeipatroon: 10-gats; 12-gats; 4-gats; 6-gats; 8-gats; Schijf; Dubbele kegel; Waaier; Meerdere gaten; Potloodstraal; Enkele kegel; Anders
sv: Spridningsmönster för bränsleinsprutare: 10 hål; 12 hål; 4 hål; 6 hål; 8 hål; Skiva; Dubbel kon; Solfjäder; Flerhåls; Rak stråle; Enkel kon; Övrigt
ko: 연료 분사기 분사 패턴: 10홀; 12홀; 4홀; 6홀; 8홀; 디스크; 듀얼 콘; 팬; 멀티홀; 펜슬 스트림; 싱글 콘; 기타
th: รูปแบบการฉีดน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิงของหัวฉีด: 10 รู; 12 รู; 4 รู; 6 รู; 8 รู; แบบแผ่น; กรวยคู่; รูปพัด; หลายรู; แบบเส้นตรง; กรวยเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Спрей модел на горивната дюза: С 10 отвора; С 12 отвора; С 4 отвора; С 6 отвора; С 8 отвора; Диск; Двоен конус; Ветрило; С множество отвори; Тясна струя; Единичен конус; Друго
vi: Kiểu phun nhiên liệu của kim phun: 10 lỗ; 12 lỗ; 4 lỗ; 6 lỗ; 8 lỗ; Dạng đĩa; Hình nón kép; Hình quạt; Nhiều lỗ; Tia nhỏ; Hình nón đơn; Khác
de: Sprühmuster des Kraftstoffeinspritzers: 10-Loch; 12-Loch; 4-Loch; 6-Loch; 8-Loch; Scheibe; Doppelkegel; Fächer; Mehrloch; Punktstrahl; Einfachkegel; Sonstige
fr: Schéma de pulvérisation de l’injecteur de carburant: 10 trous; 12 trous; 4 trous; 6 trous; 8 trous; Disque; Double cône; En éventail; Trous multiples; Jet fin; Cône simple; Autre
pl: Wzór rozpylania wtryskiwacza paliwa: 10-otworowy; 12-otworowy; 4-otworowy; 6-otworowy; 8-otworowy; Dyskowy; Podwójny stożek; Wachlarzowy; Wielootworowy; Wąski strumień; Pojedynczy stożek; Inny
zh-CN: 燃油喷射器喷雾模式: 10 孔; 12 孔; 4 孔; 6 孔; 8 孔; 盘状; 双锥形; 扇形; 多孔; 铅笔状射流; 单锥形; 其他
sk-SK: Rozptylový vzor vstrekovacieho ventilu: 10-otvorový; 12-otvorový; 4-otvorový; 6-otvorový; 8-otvorový; Diskový; Dvojitý kužeľ; Vejár; Viacotvorový; Úzky prúd; Jeden kužeľ; Iný
it: Schema di spruzzo dell'iniettore di carburante: A 10 fori; A 12 fori; A 4 fori; A 6 fori; A 8 fori; A disco; Doppio cono; A ventaglio; Multiforo; A getto sottile; Cono singolo; Altro
nb: Sprøytemønster for drivstoffinjektorer: 10-hulls; 12-hulls; 4-hulls; 6-hulls; 8-hulls; Skive; Dobbel kjegle; Vifte; Flerhulls; Blyantstråle; Enkel kjegle; Annet
ru: Форма распыла форсунки: 10 отверстий; 12 отверстий; 4 отверстия; 6 отверстий; 8 отверстий; Дисковое; Двойной конус; Веерное; Многоотверстное; Узконаправленная струя; Одинарный конус; Другое
lt-LT: Kuro purkštuko purškimo modelis: 10 skylių; 12 skylių; 4 skylių; 6 skylių; 8 skylių; Diskinis; Dvigubo kūgio; Vėduoklinis; Kelių skylių; Tiesios srovės; Vieno kūgio; Kita
pt-PT: padrão de pulverização do injetor de combustível: 10 orifícios; 12 orifícios; 4 orifícios; 6 orifícios; 8 orifícios; Disco; Cone duplo; Leque; Multiorifício; Jato reto; Cone simples; Outro
hr-HR: Uzorak prskanja injektora goriva: S 10 rupa; S 12 rupa; S 4 rupe; Sa 6 rupa; S 8 rupa; Disk; Dvostruki konus; Lepezasti mlaz; S više rupa; Uski mlaz; Jednostruki konus; Ostalo
fi: Polttoainesuuttimen ruiskutuskuvio: 10-reikäinen; 12-reikäinen; 4-reikäinen; 6-reikäinen; 8-reikäinen; Kiekko; Kaksoiskartio; Viuhka; Monireikäinen; Pistesuihku; Yksittäiskartio; Muu
el: Μοτίβο ψεκασμού μπεκ ψεκασμού καυσίμου: 10 οπών; 12 οπών; 4 οπών; 6 οπών; 8 οπών; Δίσκος; Διπλός κώνος; Βεντάλια; Πολλαπλών οπών; Λεπτή δέσμη; Μονός κώνος; Άλλο
ro-RO: Modelul de pulverizare al injectorului de combustibil: 10 orificii; 12 orificii; 4 orificii; 6 orificii; 8 orificii; Disc; Con dublu; Evantai; Multi-orificiu; Jet subțire; Un singur con; Altele
cs: Tvar rozstřiku proudu paliva: 10otvorový; 12otvorový; 4otvorový; 6otvorový; 8otvorový; Diskový; Dvojitý kuželový; Vějířový; Víceotvorový; Paprskový; Jednoduchý kuželový; Ostatní
tr: Yakıt enjektörü püskürtme deseni: 10 delikli; 12 delikli; 4 delikli; 6 delikli; 8 delikli; Disk; Çift koni; Fan; Çok delikli; Kalem hüzme; Tek koni; Diğer
zh-TW: 噴油器噴霧模式: 10 孔; 12 孔; 4 孔; 6 孔; 8 孔; 圓盤式; 雙錐面; 扇形; 多孔; 柱狀; 單錐面; 其他
ja: 燃料噴射ノズルの噴射パターン: 10ホール; 12ホール; 4ホール; 6ホール; 8ホール; ディスク; デュアルコーン; ファン; マルチホール; ペンシルストリーム; シングルコーン; その他
sl-SI: Vzorec pršenja vbrizgalnika goriva: 10 lukenj; 12 lukenj; 4 luknje; 6 lukenj; 8 lukenj; Disk; Dvojni stožec; Pahljača; Več lukenj; Tanek curek; Enojni stožec; Drugo
en: Fuel injector spray pattern: 10-hole; 12-hole; 4-hole; 6-hole; 8-hole; Disc; Dual cone; Fan; Multi-hole; Pencil stream; Single cone; Other
hu: Üzemanyag-befecskendező szórási mintázata: 10 lyukú; 12 lyukú; 4 lyukú; 6 lyukú; 8 lyukú; Tárcsás; Kettős kúpos; Legyező; Többlyukú; Egyenes sugarú; Egyszeres kúpos; Egyéb
pt-BR: Padrão de pulverização do injetor de combustível: 10 furos; 12 furos; 4 furos; 6 furos; 8 furos; Disco; Cone duplo; Leque; Múltiplos furos; Jato linear; Cone único; Outro
es: Patrón de pulverización del inyector de combustible: 10 orificios; 12 orificios; 4 orificios; 6 orificios; 8 orificios; Disco; Doble cono; Abanico; Múltiples orificios; Chorro fino; Cono simple; Otro
da: Brændstofinjektorens sprøjtemønster: 10 huller; 12 huller; 4 huller; 6 huller; 8 huller; Skive; Dobbelt kegle; Vifte; Flere huller; Tynd stråle; Enkelt kegle; Andet